Vermont, session 2025-2026, H663.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6093 is amended to read:
§ 6093. MITIGATION OF PRIMARY AGRICULTURAL SOILS
* * *
(c) Municipal use exemption. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section to the contrary, the requirements for mitigation of primary agricultural
soils shall not apply to the conversion or development of such soils when the
development is undertaken by a municipality on land owned by the
VT LEG #385343 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.663
2026 Page 2 of 2
municipality and the municipality demonstrates that there are no reasonable
alternative locations within its jurisdiction that would avoid or minimize the
impact to primary agricultural soils and the proposed use of the development
is:
(1) exclusively for municipal purposes, including the construction,
expansion, or operation of municipal infrastructure, public safety facilities, or
public works; or
(2) intended solely for the recreation, health, or welfare of the residents
of that municipality and is open for general public use.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385343 v.1